Alaska, session 34, HB286.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. AS 29.45.050(r) is amended to read: 06 (r) A municipality may by ordinance exempt or partially exempt from 07 taxation [AN AMOUNT NOT TO EXCEED $10,000 OF THE ASSESSED VALUE 08 OF] real property owned and occupied as a permanent place of abode by a resident 09 who provides in the municipality volunteer (1) fire fighting services and is certified as 10 a firefighter by the Department of Public Safety, or (2) emergency medical services or 11 mobile intensive care paramedic services and is certified or licensed under 12 AS 18.08.082. If two or more individuals are eligible for an exemption for the same 13 property, not more than two exemptions may be granted. 14 * Sec. 2. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.